Maryland, session 2025, SB0075.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
3–8A–19.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0075*

SENATE BILL 75
(a) The provisions of this section do not apply to a peace order request or a peace
order proceeding.
(b) (1) After an adjudicatory hearing the court shall hold a separate
disposition hearing, unless the petition or citation is dismissed or unless such hearing is
waived in writing by all of the parties.
(2) A disposition hearing may be held on the same day as the adjudicatory
hearing if notice of the disposition hearing, as prescribed by the Maryland Rules, is waived
on the record by all of the parties.
(c) The priorities in making a disposition are consistent with the purposes
specified in § 3–8A–02 of this subtitle.
(d) (1) [In] SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2)(II) OF THIS SUBSECTION, IN
making a disposition on a petition under this subtitle, the court may:
(i) Subject to § 3–8A–19.6 of this subtitle, place the child on
probation or under supervision in his own home or in the custody or under the guardianship
of a relative or other fit person, upon terms the court deems appropriate, including
community detention;
(ii) Subject to the provisions of paragraphs (2) and (3) of this
subsection, commit the child to the custody or under the guardianship of the Department
of Juvenile Services, the Maryland Department of Health, or a public or licensed private
agency on terms that the court considers appropriate to meet the priorities set forth in §
3–8A–02 of this subtitle, including designation of the type of facility where the child is to
be accommodated, until custody or guardianship is terminated with approval of the court
or as required under § 3–8A–24 of this subtitle; or
(iii) Order the child, parents, guardian, or custodian of the child to
participate in rehabilitative services that are in the best interest of the child and the family.
(2) (I) In addition to the provisions of paragraph (1) of this subsection
AND EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, in making a
disposition on a petition, the court may adopt a treatment service plan, as defined in §
3–8A–20.1 of this subtitle.
(II) 1. THE COURT SHALL PLACE A CHILD NOT ORDERED TO
BE HELD IN SECURE CONFINEMENT ON PROBATION IF:
A. THE COURT DETERMINES THE CHILD COMMITTED A
DELINQUENT ACT THAT, IF COMMITTED BY AN ADULT, WOULD CONSTITUTE A CRIME
OF VIOLENCE AS DEFINED IN § 14–101 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE, OR
COMMITTED A CRIME OF VIOLENCE WITH A DANGEROUS WEAPON;

SENATE BILL 75 3
B. THE COURT DETERMINES THE CHILD USED A
FIREARM IN THE COMMISSION OF A CRIME IN VIOLATION OF § 4–204 OF THE
CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE; OR
C. THE CHILD IS FOUND TO BE A CHILD IN NEED OF
SUPERVISION BECAUSE THE CHILD IS REQUIRED BY LAW TO ATTEND SCHOOL AND
IS HABITUALLY TRUANT.
2. PROBATION REQUIRED UNDER SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 1
OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH SHALL:
A. INCLUDE AN ORDER TO ADOPT A TREATMENT
SERVICE PLAN, AS DEFINED IN § 3–8A–20.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
B. REQUIRE THE PARTICIPATION OF THE CHILD AND
THE CHILD’S PARENT, GUARDIAN, OR CUSTODIAN IN REHABILITATIVE SERVICES
DESCRIBED IN PARAGRAPH (1)(III) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(3) (i) A child may not be committed to the Department of Juvenile
Services for out–of–home placement if the most serious offense is:
1. Possession of cannabis under § 5–601(c)(2)(ii) of the
Criminal Law Article;
2. An offense that would be a misdemeanor if committed by
an adult, unless the offense involves a firearm;
3. A technical violation, as defined in § 3–8A–19.6 of this
subtitle; or
4. A first–time violation for making a false statement, report,
or complaint of an emergency or a crime under § 9–501.1 of the Criminal Law Article.
(ii) This paragraph may not be construed to prohibit the court from
committing the child to another appropriate agency.
(4) A child committed under paragraph (1)(ii) of this subsection may not be
accommodated in a facility that has reached budgeted capacity if a bed is available in
another comparable facility in the State, unless the placement to the facility that has
reached budgeted capacity has been recommended by the Department of Juvenile Services.
(5) The court shall consider any oral address made in accordance with §
11–403 of the Criminal Procedure Article or any victim impact statement, as described in

SENATE BILL 75
§ 11–402 of the Criminal Procedure Article, in determining an appropriate disposition on a
petition.
(6) (i) If the court finds that a child enrolled in a public elementary or
secondary school is delinquent or in need of supervision and commits the child to the
custody or under the guardianship of the Department of Juvenile Services, the court may
notify the county superintendent, the supervisor of pupil personnel, or any other official
designated by the county superintendent of the fact that the child has been found to be
delinquent or in need of supervision and has been committed to the custody or under the
guardianship of the Department of Juvenile Services.
(ii) If the court rescinds the commitment order for a child enrolled in
a public elementary or secondary school, the court may notify the county superintendent,
the supervisor of pupil personnel, or any other official designated by the county
superintendent of the fact that the child is no longer committed to the custody of the
Department of Juvenile Services.
(iii) The notice authorized under subparagraphs (i) and (ii) of this
paragraph may not include any order or pleading related to the delinquency or child in need
of supervision case.
(7) If a child placed in community detention under an electronic monitoring
agreement under this subsection violates the agreement, the Department of Juvenile
Services shall notify within 24 hours after the violation:
(i) The juvenile court;
(ii) The office of the State’s Attorney; and
(iii) The child’s defense attorney.
3–8A–20.1.
(a) (1) In this section, “treatment service plan” means a plan recommended OR
ORDERED at a disposition hearing under § 3–8A–19 of this subtitle or at a disposition
review hearing under this section by the Department of Juvenile Services to the court
proposing specific assistance, guidance, treatment, or rehabilitation of a child.
(2) In making a treatment service plan, a juvenile counselor shall meet
with the child who is the subject of the treatment service plan and the child’s parent,
guardian, or legal custodian to discuss the treatment service plan.
(3) (I) If a child’s parent, guardian, or legal custodian is unable or
refuses to meet with the juvenile counselor, the treatment service plan shall indicate that
the parent, guardian, or legal custodian is unable or refuses to meet, and the reason for the
inability or refusal to meet, if known.

SENATE BILL 75 5
(II) IF THE COURT ORDERS A TREATMENT SERVICE PLAN
UNDER § 3–8A–19(D)(2)(II) OF THIS SUBTITLE AND THE CHILD’S PARENT,
GUARDIAN, OR LEGAL CUSTODIAN DOES NOT PARTICIPATE IN THE TREATMENT
SERVICE PLAN OR MEET WITH THE JUVENILE COUNSELOR, THE COURT SHALL
ORDER THE PARENT, GUARDIAN, OR LEGAL CUSTODIAN TO PARTICIPATE IN THE
TREATMENT SERVICE PLAN AND MEET WITH THE JUVENILE COUNSELOR.
(4) At a minimum, the treatment service plan shall include:
(i) The recommended level of supervision for the child;
(ii) Specific goals for the child and family to meet, along with
timelines for meeting those goals;
(iii) A statement of any condition that the child’s parent, guardian, or
legal custodian must change in order to alleviate any risks to the child;
(iv) A statement of the services to be provided to the child and child’s
family; and
(v) Any other information that may be necessary to make a
disposition consistent with the child’s best interests and the protection of the public
interest.
(b) (1) In making a disposition on a petition under § 3–8A–19 of this subtitle,
if the court adopts a treatment service plan, the Department of Juvenile Services shall
ensure that implementation of the treatment service plan occurs within 25 days after the
date of disposition.
(2) If a treatment service plan requires specified supervision, mentoring,
mediation, monitoring, or placement, implementation of the treatment service plan is
considered to have occurred only when the supervision, mentoring, mediation, monitoring,
or placement occurs.
(3) The Department of Juvenile Services shall provide certification in
writing to the court within 25 days after the date of disposition whether implementation of
the treatment service plan has occurred and explain attempts made to ensure
implementation.
(4) The Department of Juvenile Services shall forward a copy of the
certification described in paragraph (3) of this subsection to the Commission on Juvenile
Justice Reform and Emerging and Best Practices under § 9–3502 of the State Government
Article so that the Commission may evaluate patterns of failed implementation.
(c) (1) If a treatment service plan is not implemented by the Department of
Juvenile Services within 25 days under subsection (b)(3) of this section, the court shall

SENATE BILL 75
schedule, within 7 days after receipt of the certification, a disposition review hearing to be
held within 30 days after receipt of the certification.
(2) The court shall give at least 7 days’ notice of the date and time of the
disposition review hearing to each party and to the Department of Juvenile Services.
(d) (1) The court shall hold a disposition review hearing unless the
Department of Juvenile Services certifies in writing to the court prior to the hearing that
implementation of the treatment service plan has occurred.
(2) At a disposition review hearing, the court may:
(i) Revise, in accordance with the provisions of § 3–8A–19 of this
subtitle, the disposition previously made; and
(ii) Revise the treatment service plan previously adopted.
(e) This section may not be construed to provide entitlement to services not
otherwise provided by law.
(f) The Supreme Court of Maryland may adopt rules to implement the provisions
of this section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.